Maryland, session 2026, HB0791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Phased in value” has the meaning stated in § 8–103 of the Tax –
Property Article.
(3) “Subdivision” has the meaning stated in § 8–104 of the Tax – Property
Article.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a taxable year beginning after
June 30, 2026, but before July 1, 2028, the assessed value of residential real property in
Baltimore County, including the phased in value of the residential real property, may not
be increased over the prior value unless:
(1) the zoning classification is changed at the initiative of the owner or
anyone having an interest in the property;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0791*

HOUSE BILL 791
(2) a change in use or character occurs;
(3) substantially completed improvements are made that add at least
$100,000 in value to the property;
(4) an error in calculation or measurement of the real property caused the
value to be erroneous;
(5) a residential use assessment is terminated in accordance with § 8–228
of the Tax – Property Article; or
(6) a subdivision occurs.
(c) On or before December 1, 2027, the State Department of Assessments and
Taxation shall:
(1) retain an independent third party to:
(i) study the residential real property assessment practices and
methodology of the Department; and
(ii) recommend any alterations to the assessment practices and
methodology necessary to ensure the Department utilizes best practices when assessing
residential real property; and
(2) report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on the findings and recommendations of the
study described under item (1) of this subsection and actions taken or to be taken by the
Department to implement the recommendations of the independent third party.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.